Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3604
Required information; report changes.

A home inspector shall report a change in information required by section 76-3602 or 76-3603 within forty-five calendar days of such change.

Laws 2021, LB423, § 4;

Laws 2023, LB531, § 31.